Nebraska, session 109, LB1041.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB1041 LB1041
2026 2026
Section 1. (1) A city shall allow a minimum of one accessory
dwelling unit on the same lot as a single-family residence in accordance
with the following conditions:
(a) An accessory dwelling unit shall comply with all applicable
building regulations;
(b) An accessory dwelling unit shall not exceed one thousand square
feet or fifty percent of the size of the single-family residence,
whichever is larger;
(c) An accessory dwelling unit shall be prohibited or limited only
to the extent that a city ordinance relating to historic buildings, a
deed restriction, a restriction of a homeowners' association, a
restriction of a co-owners association organized under the Condominium
Property Act, or a restriction of a unit owners association organized
under the Nebraska Condominium Act limits or prohibits the construction
or use of an accessory dwelling unit; and
(d) If a manufactured home or a mobile home is used as an accessory
dwelling unit, the manufactured home or mobile home shall be converted to
real property by being placed on a permanent foundation and assessed for
real property taxes.
(2) Except as otherwise provided by state law or in subsection (1)
of this section, a city shall not:
(a) Impose requirements related to the placement or appearance of an
accessory dwelling unit that are more restrictive than those imposed on a
single-family residence, including, but not limited to, maximum building
heights, minimum setback requirements, minimum lot sizes, minimum
building frontages, maximum lot coverages, density requirements, and
aesthetic or architectural standards or requirements. Additionally, a
city shall not require an accessory dwelling unit to match the exterior
design, roof pitch, or finishing materials of the single-family
residence;
(b) Impose regulations on the use of an accessory dwelling unit as a
-2-

LB1041 LB1041
2026 2026
rental property that are more restrictive than those provided for in the
Uniform Residential Landlord and Tenant Act;
(c) Require that the lot containing a single-family residence and an
accessory dwelling unit have additional parking beyond that required for
a single-family residence or require a fee to be paid in lieu of
providing such additional parking;
(d) Restrict the occupancy of either the single-family residence or
the accessory dwelling unit in any of the following ways:
(i) Requiring the property owner to be a resident;
(ii) Requiring a familial, marital, or employment relationship to
exist between the occupants of the single-family residence and the
occupants of the accessory dwelling unit; or
(iii) Restricting the occupancy of an accessory dwelling unit based
on income or age;
(e) Require new or separate utility lines between the accessory
dwelling unit and public utility service connections. However, if full
utility access that includes a separate metering system for billing
purposes cannot be provided to the accessory dwelling unit, then the city
can require new or separate utility lines;
(f) Impose a different city impact fee structure or development
standard for an accessory dwelling unit than those used for the single-
family residence on the same lot; or
(g) Require improvements or repairs to public streets or sidewalks
beyond those imposed on the single-family residence on the same lot.
(3) A city shall approve an accessory dwelling unit permit
application that meets the requirements set forth by state law and in
subsection (1) of this section without discretionary review or hearing
and consistent with the time frame assigned to the approval of a single-
family residence. An accessory dwelling unit permit application shall not
have a review timeline or schedule in excess of a city's normal review
schedule for a single-family residence. If the city denies an accessory
-3-

LB1041 LB1041
2026 2026
dwelling unit permit, the reason for denial shall be provided in writing
to the applicant and shall include any remedy necessary to secure
approval.
(4) A city ordinance regulating accessory dwelling units in a manner
that conflicts with this section is void. Nothing in this section
prohibits a city from adopting an ordinance that is more permissive than
the requirements provided in this section.
(5) For purposes of this section:
(a) Accessory dwelling unit means an additional residential dwelling
unit located on the same lot as a single-family residence that is either
attached to or detached from the single-family residence;
(b) City means any city or village in this state;
(c) Detached includes being part of any accessory structure such as
a detached garage;
(d) Dwelling unit means a structure or the part of a structure that
is used as a home, residence, or sleeping place by one person who
maintains a household or by two or more persons who maintain a common
household; and
(e) Single-family residence means a structure maintained and used as
a single dwelling unit.
Sec. 2. (1) A county shall allow a minimum of one accessory
dwelling unit on the same lot as a single-family residence in accordance
with the following conditions:
(a) An accessory dwelling unit shall comply with all applicable
building regulations;
(b) An accessory dwelling unit shall not exceed one thousand square
feet or fifty percent of the size of the single-family residence,
whichever is larger;
(c) An accessory dwelling unit shall be prohibited or limited only
to the extent that a county resolution relating to historic buildings, a
deed restriction, a restriction of a homeowners' association, a
-4-

LB1041 LB1041
2026 2026
restriction of a co-owners association organized under the Condominium
Property Act, or a restriction of a unit owners association organized
under the Nebraska Condominium Act limits or prohibits the construction
or use of an accessory dwelling unit; and
(d) If a manufactured home or a mobile home is used as an accessory
dwelling unit, the manufactured home or mobile home shall be converted to
real property by being placed on a permanent foundation and assessed for
real property taxes.
(2) Except as otherwise provided by state law or in subsection (1)
of this section, a county shall not:
(a) Impose requirements related to the placement or appearance of an
accessory dwelling unit that are more restrictive than those imposed on a
single-family residence, including, but not limited to, maximum building
heights, minimum setback requirements, minimum lot sizes, minimum
building frontages, maximum lot coverages, density requirements, and
aesthetic or architectural standards or requirements. Additionally, a
county shall not require an accessory dwelling unit to match the exterior
design, roof pitch, or finishing materials of the single-family
residence;
(b) Impose regulations on the use of an accessory dwelling unit as a
rental property that are more restrictive than those provided for in the
Uniform Residential Landlord and Tenant Act;
(c) Require that the lot containing a single-family residence and an
accessory dwelling unit have additional parking beyond that required for
a single-family residence or require a fee to be paid in lieu of
providing such additional parking;
(d) Restrict the occupancy of either the single-family residence or
the accessory dwelling unit in any of the following ways:
(i) Requiring the property owner to be a resident;
(ii) Requiring a familial, marital, or employment relationship to
exist between the occupants of the single-family residence and the
-5-

LB1041 LB1041
2026 2026
occupants of the accessory dwelling unit; or
(iii) Restricting the occupancy of an accessory dwelling unit based
on income or age;
(e) Require new or separate utility lines between the accessory
dwelling unit and public utility service connections. However, if full
utility access that includes a separate metering system for billing
purposes cannot be provided to the accessory dwelling unit, then the
county can require new or separate utility lines;
(f) Impose a different county impact fee structure or development
standard for an accessory dwelling unit than those used for the single-
family residence on the same lot; or
(g) Require improvements or repairs to public streets or sidewalks
beyond those imposed on the single-family residence on the same lot.
(3) A county shall approve an accessory dwelling unit permit
application that meets the requirements set forth by state law and in
subsection (1) of this section without discretionary review or hearing
and consistent with the time frame assigned to the approval of a single-
family residence. An accessory dwelling unit permit application shall not
have a review timeline or schedule in excess of a county's normal review
schedule for a single-family residence. If the county denies an accessory
dwelling unit permit, the reason for denial shall be provided in writing
to the applicant and shall include any remedy necessary to secure
approval.
(4) A county resolution regulating accessory dwelling units in a
manner that conflicts with this section is void. Nothing in this section
prohibits a county from adopting a resolution that is more permissive
than the requirements provided in this section.
(5) For purposes of this section:
(a) Accessory dwelling unit means an additional residential dwelling
unit located on the same lot as a single-family residence that is either
attached to or detached from the single-family residence;
-6-

LB1041 LB1041
2026 2026
(b) Detached includes being part of any accessory structure such as
a detached garage;
(c) Dwelling unit means a structure or the part of a structure that
is used as a home, residence, or sleeping place by one person who
maintains a household or by two or more persons who maintain a common
household; and
(d) Single-family residence means a structure maintained and used as
a single dwelling unit.
-7-